Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB338.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 100.217 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before any zoning regulation may have legal effect within the planning unit, a
board or boards of adjustment shall be appointed for the planning unit as
stated in the agreement under which the unit operates. The agreement may
provide for a joint board of adjustment. The agreement may provide for
additional boards of adjustment with jurisdiction of a particular city or area
within the planning unit. Provided, that the jurisdiction of the boards of
adjustment so established shall be clearly defined as to territorial limits, that
all territory within the planning unit is within the jurisdiction of some board of
adjustment so established and, that no territory is subject to the jurisdiction of
more than one (1) board of adjustment, except as provided in KRS
100.203(5).
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, in a county containing
a consolidated local government where a planning agreement is not required,
there shall be one (1) board of adjustment which shall be established by
ordinance of the consolidated local government. Until such time as the
consolidated local government establishes and appoints a board of adjustment
pursuant to this subsection, the existing board of adjustment for the county
shall serve as the board of adjustment for the entire planning unit.
(c) A city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000)
based upon the most recent federal decennial census within a county
containing a consolidated local government where a planning agreement is not
required may establish, by ordinance, a board of zoning adjustment under the
provisions of this section. If such a city creates a board of zoning adjustment,
then that board of zoning adjustment shall have exclusive jurisdiction within
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2471
that city's territorial boundaries.
(2) (a) A board of adjustment shall consist of either three (3), five (5), or seven (7)
members, all of whom must be citizen members, and not more than two (2) of
whom may be citizen members of the planning commission.
(b) A joint board of adjustment shall consist of no fewer than three (3) members,
all of whom must be citizen members, and no more than two (2) of whom
may be citizen members of the planning commission. Each appointing
authority whose jurisdiction is represented by the joint board shall be entitled
to appoint one (1) member to represent that jurisdiction.
(3) The mayor shall be the appointing authority for cities, and the county
judge/executive shall be the appointing authority for counties, subject to the
approval of their respective legislative bodies. The mayor shall be the appointing
authority for a consolidated local government pursuant to the provisions of KRS
67C.139.
(4) The term of office for the board of adjustment shall be four (4) years, but the term
of office of members first appointed shall be staggered so that a proportionate
number serve one (1), two (2), three (3), and four (4) years respectively.
(5) Vacancies on the board of adjustment shall be filled within sixty (60) days by the
appropriate appointing authority. If the authority fails to act within that time, the
planning commission shall fill the vacancy. When a vacancy occurs other than
through expiration of the term of office, it shall be filled for the remainder of that
term.
(6) All members of boards of adjustment shall, before entering upon their duties,
qualify by taking the oath of office prescribed by Section 228 of the Constitution of
the Commonwealth of Kentucky before any judge, county judge/executive, notary
public, clerk of a court, or justice of the peace within the district or county in which
he resides.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2471
(7) Reimbursement for expenses or compensation or both may be authorized for
members on a board of adjustment.
(8) Any member of a board of adjustment may be removed by the appropriate
appointing authority for inefficiency, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or conflict of
interest. Any appointing authority who exercises the power to remove a member of
the board of adjustment shall submit a written statement to the commission setting
forth the reasons for removal, and the statement shall be read at the next meeting of
the board of adjustment, which shall be open to the general public. The member so
removed shall have the right of appeal from the removal to the Circuit Court of the
county in which he resides.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, when a city of the first class and a
county containing such city have in effect a compact pursuant to KRS 79.310 to
79.330, the terms of the members on the board shall be for three (3) years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. Upon the effective date of the
compact, if the board is not reorganized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
the mayor, and county judge/executive with approval of the fiscal court, shall adjust
the terms of the sitting members to provide that the terms of one-third (1/3) plus
one (1) of the members expire in one (1) year, the terms of one-third (1/3) of the
members in two (2) years, and the terms of one-third (1/3) of the members expire in
three (3) years. Upon expiration of these staggered terms, successors shall be
appointed for a term of three (3) years. Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this
section, upon the establishment of a consolidated local government in a county
where a city of the first class and a county containing such city have had in effect a
cooperative compact pursuant to KRS 79.310 to 79.330, the terms of the members
on the board shall be for three (3) years and until their successors are appointed and
qualified. Upon expiration of the terms of incumbent members, their successors
shall be appointed to three (3) year terms which are staggered.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2471
(10) Each board of adjustment annually shall elect a chairman, vice chairman, and
secretary and any other officers it deems necessary, and any officer shall be eligible
for reelection at the expiration of his or her term.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/2/2026 1:08 PM Jacketed